Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.050

Legal aid bureau defined.

A legal aid bureau (hereinafter called the bureau), is an agency for the rendition of organized legal aid to indigent persons resident in the county, consisting of one director, who shall be an attorney resident in the county, and who shall be in good standing and active membership in the Washington State Bar Association, together with such professional and other personnel, such office facilities, and other equipment, as may be determined by the bar board and be financed by the county board.

[ 1939 c 93 s 5; RRS s 10007-205. Formerly RCW 74.36.050.]